Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: DIVISION I FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND Section 1. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS ââ ADMINISTRATION. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department for the blind for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,207,190 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 88.98 DIVISION II FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION Sec. 2. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: Senate File 647, p. 2 1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,073,808 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 71.62 b. By January 15, 2026, the department shall submit a written report to the general assembly detailing the departmentâs antibullying programming and current and projected expenditures for such programming for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. 2. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION ADMINISTRATION For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 721,779 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 10.80 3. PUBLIC BROADCASTING DIVISION For salaries, support, maintenance, capital expenditures, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,165,236 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 57.11 4. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION For reimbursement for career and technical education expenditures made by regional career and technical education planning partnerships in accordance with section 256.136: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,952,459 5. SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE For use as state matching moneys for federal programs that shall be disbursed according to federal regulations, including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,176,797 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 26.42 6. BIRTH TO AGE THREE SERVICES a. For expansion of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004, Pub. L. No. 108-446, as amended to January 1, 2018, birth through age three Senate File 647, p. 3 services due to increased numbers of children qualifying for those services: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,721,400 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, $383,769 shall be allocated to the child health specialty clinics administered by the state university of Iowa in order to provide additional support for infants and toddlers who are born prematurely, drug-exposed, or medically fragile. 7. EARLY HEAD START PROJECTS a. For early head start projects: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 574,500 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be used for implementation and expansion of early head start pilot projects addressing the comprehensive cognitive, social, emotional, and developmental needs of children from birth to age three, including prenatal support for qualified families. The projects shall promote healthy prenatal outcomes and healthy family functioning, and strengthen the development of infants and toddlers in low-income families. Priority shall be given to those organizations that have previously qualified for and received state funding to administer an early head start project. 8. STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT AND TEACHER QUALITY PROGRAM For purposes of the student achievement and teacher quality program established pursuant to chapter 284 , and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,990,467 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5.87 9. STATEWIDE STUDENT ASSESSMENT a. For distribution to the Iowa testing program by the department of education on behalf of school districts and accredited nonpublic schools to offset the costs associated with a statewide student assessment administered in accordance with section 256.7, subsection 21 , paragraph âbâ: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more than $300,000 shall be distributed to the Iowa testing programs within the state university of Iowa college of education to offset the costs of administering the statewide student Senate File 647, p. 4 assessment at accredited nonpublic schools. 10. STATEWIDE CLEARINGHOUSE TO EXPAND WORK-BASED LEARNING For support costs associated with the creation of a statewide clearinghouse to expand work-based learning as a part of the future ready Iowa initiative: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 11. POSTSECONDARY SUMMER CLASSES FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS PROGRAM For support costs associated with the creation of a program to provide additional moneys for resident high school pupils enrolled in grades 9 through 12 to attend a community college for college-level classes or attend a class taught by a community college-employed instructor during the summer and outside of the regular school year through a contractual agreement between a community college and a school district under the future ready Iowa initiative: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 12. JOBS FOR AMERICAâS GRADUATES For school districts to reinforce collaborative efforts and regional initiatives that accelerate work-based learning and credential attainment, and to provide direct career education services to identified middle school or high school students enrolled in school districts through direct instruction by a jobs for Americaâs graduates specialist: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,946,450 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys received by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 13. ATTENDANCE CENTER PERFORMANCE/GENERAL INTERNET SITE AND DATA SYSTEM SUPPORT Senate File 647, p. 5 For administration of a process for school districts to establish specific performance goals and to evaluate the performance of each attendance center operated by the district in order to arrive at an overall school performance grade and report card for each attendance center, for internet site and data system support, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.85 14. SUCCESSFUL PROGRESSION FOR EARLY READERS For distribution to school districts for implementation of section 279.68, subsection 2 , relating to successful progression for early readers: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,824,782 15. EARLY WARNING SYSTEM FOR LITERACY a. For purposes of purchasing a statewide license for an early warning assessment and administering the early warning system for literacy established in accordance with section 279.68 and rules adopted in accordance with section 256.7, subsection 31 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,915,000 b. The department shall administer and distribute to school districts and accredited nonpublic schools the early warning assessment system that allows teachers to screen and monitor student literacy skills from prekindergarten through grade six. The department may charge school districts and accredited nonpublic schools a fee for the system not to exceed the actual costs to purchase a statewide license for the early warning assessment minus the moneys received by the department under this subsection. The fee shall be determined by dividing the actual remaining costs to purchase the statewide license for the school year by the number of pupils assessed under the system in the current fiscal year. School districts may use moneys received pursuant to section 257.10, subsection 11 , and moneys received for purposes of implementing section 279.68, subsection 2 , to pay the early warning assessment system fee. 16. IOWA READING RESEARCH CENTER a. For purposes of the Iowa reading research center in order to implement, in collaboration with the area education Senate File 647, p. 6 agencies, the provisions of section 256.9, subsection 49 , paragraph âcâ: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 b. From moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more than $250,000 shall be used for collaborations with the state board of education relating to the approval of practitioner preparation programs pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ, and with the board of educational examiners for the establishment and continuing oversight of the advanced dyslexia specialist endorsement pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 21. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the center shall submit a report to the general assembly detailing the expenditures of moneys used for purposes of this paragraph âbâ. c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 17. COMPUTER SCIENCE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT INCENTIVE FUND For deposit in the computer science professional development incentive fund established under section 284.6A : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 18. CHILDRENâS MENTAL HEALTH SCHOOL-BASED TRAINING AND SUPPORT a. For distribution to area education agencies for school-based childrenâs mental health services, including mental health awareness training for educators: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,383,936 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection for distribution to area education agencies, $200,000 shall be used for purposes of implementing a childrenâs grief and loss rural pilot program to serve Iowa children in rural school districts or accredited nonpublic schools. The pilot program shall be administered by, and the moneys allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be distributed to, an existing statewide not-for-profit health care organization that currently provides Senate File 647, p. 7 grief and loss services to children. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the health care organization receiving moneys pursuant to this paragraph shall prepare a report, in collaboration with the department of education, detailing the expenditures of moneys used for the purposes of this program and its outcomes, which shall be submitted to the general assembly by September 30, 2026. 19. BEST BUDDIES IOWA a. For school districts to create opportunities for one-to-one friendships, integrated employment, and leadership development for students with intellectual and developmental disabilities: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 35,000 b. The department of education shall establish criteria for the distribution of moneys appropriated under this subsection and shall require an organization receiving moneys under this subsection to annually report student identifying data for students participating in the program to the department in the manner prescribed by the department as a condition of receiving such moneys. 20. MIDWESTERN HIGHER EDUCATION COMPACT a. For distribution to the midwestern higher education compact to pay Iowaâs member state annual obligation: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,000 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 21. NONPUBLIC SCHOOL CONCURRENT ENROLLMENT PAYMENTS TO COMMUNITY COLLEGES For payments to community colleges for the concurrent enrollment of accredited nonpublic school students under section 261E.8, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes Senate File 647, p. 8 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 22. COMMUNITY COLLEGES For general state financial aid to merged areas, as defined in section 260C.2 , in accordance with section 260C.18C: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $243,358,161 23. IOWA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,049,644 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 121.00 24. IOWA EDUCATIONAL SERVICES FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED PROGRAM For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,012,169 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 56.00 25. SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, AND MATHEMATICS (STEM) COLLABORATIVE INITIATIVE For purposes of the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) collaborative initiative established pursuant to section 256.111, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,354,848 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5.00 a. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be expended for salaries, staffing, institutional support, activities directly related to recruitment of kindergarten through grade 12 mathematics and science teachers, and for ongoing mathematics and science programming for students enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12. b. The department shall work with the community colleges to develop STEM professional development programs for community college instructors and STEM curriculum development. c. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not less than $500,000 shall be used to provide technology education opportunities to high school, career academy, and community Senate File 647, p. 9 college students through a public-private partnership, as well as opportunities for students and faculties at these institutions to secure broad-based information technology certification. The partnership shall provide all of the following: (1) A research-based curriculum. (2) Online access to the curriculum. (3) Instructional software for classroom and student use. (4) Certification of skills and competencies in a broad base of information technology-related skill areas. (5) Professional development for teachers. (6) Deployment and program support, including but not limited to integration with current curriculum standards. d. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , of the moneys appropriated in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year, an amount equivalent to not more than 5 percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for summer programs for students until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 26. THERAPEUTIC CLASSROOM INCENTIVE FUND For deposit in the therapeutic classroom incentive fund established pursuant to section 256.25 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,351,382 27. ONLINE STATE JOB POSTING SYSTEM For purposes of administering an online state job posting system that allows the department of education, school districts, charter schools, area education agencies, and accredited nonpublic schools to post job openings on an internet site: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 265,000 28. LEAD-K PROGRAM For purposes of developing guidelines for a comprehensive family support mentoring program that meets the language and communication needs of families pursuant to section 256.106: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 29. DIVISION OF SPECIAL EDUCATION For general supervision, oversight, compliance, employee salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes Senate File 647, p. 10 within the area education agency regions and the department of education main office, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 60.00 30. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT For purposes of providing required professional development to public and nonpublic schools: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,176,458 31. COLLEGE STUDENT AID COMMISSION a. Administration For general administration salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for the administration of the future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship program in accordance with section 256.228, including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes related to the future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship program, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 591,533 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.95 b. National guard service scholarship program For purposes of providing national guard service scholarships under the program established in section 256.210: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,600,000 c. All Iowa opportunity scholarship program (1) For purposes of the all Iowa opportunity scholarship program established pursuant to section 256.212: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,229,468 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, if the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph exceed $500,000, âeligible institutionâ as defined in section 256.212 shall, during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, include accredited private institutions as defined in section 256.183. d. Teach Iowa scholar program For purposes of the teach Iowa scholar program established pursuant to section 256.218: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 948,715 e. Rural veterinarian loan repayment program Senate File 647, p. 11 For purposes of the rural veterinarian loan repayment program established pursuant to section 256.226: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 f. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship program For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship fund established pursuant to section 256.228: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,927,005 g. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant program For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant fund established pursuant to section 256.229: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 h. Iowa workforce grant and incentive program For deposit in the Iowa workforce grant and incentive program fund created in section 256.230: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,500,000 i. Health care professional incentive program For deposit in the health care professional incentive program fund created in section 256.222, if enacted in 2025 Iowa Acts, Senate File 618, 2025 Iowa Acts, House File 972, or any successor legislation: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,985,911 Sec. 3. IOWA SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled worker and job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. For purposes of providing skilled workforce shortage tuition grants in accordance with section 256.227: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 2. For deposit in the workforce training and economic development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,100,000 From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more than $100,000 shall be used by the department for administration of the workforce training and economic Senate File 647, p. 12 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A . 3. For capital projects at community colleges that meet the definition of the term âvertical infrastructureâ in section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 Moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be disbursed pursuant to section 260G.6, subsection 3 . Projects that qualify for moneys appropriated in this subsection must include at least one of the following: a. Accelerated career education program capital projects. b. Major renovations and major repair needs, including health, life, and fire safety needs, including compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act. 4. For deposit in the pathways for academic career and employment fund established pursuant to section 260H.2 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,800,000 5. For deposit in the gap tuition assistance fund established pursuant to section 260I.2 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 6. For support costs associated with administering a workforce preparation outcome reporting system for the purpose of collecting and reporting data relating to the educational and employment outcomes of workforce preparation programs receiving moneys pursuant to this section: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 75,000 7. For STEM best: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. Sec. 4. CHIROPRACTIC LOAN FUNDS. Notwithstanding section 256.204, the moneys deposited in the chiropractic loan revolving fund created pursuant to section 256.204 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, may be used for purposes of the chiropractic loan forgiveness program established in section 256.205. Sec. 5. PRESCRIPTION DRUG COSTS. The department of Senate File 647, p. 13 administrative services shall pay the Iowa school for the deaf and the Iowa educational services for the blind and visually impaired program the moneys collected from the counties during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for expenses relating to prescription drug costs for students attending the Iowa school for the deaf and the Iowa educational services for the blind and visually impaired program. DIVISION III FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ STATE BOARD OF REGENTS Sec. 6. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the state board of regents for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. OFFICE OF STATE BOARD OF REGENTS a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 764,642 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.48 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the state board of regents shall submit a quarterly financial report to the general assembly in a format agreed upon by the state board of regents office and the legislative services agency. The report submitted for the quarter ending December 31, 2025, shall include the five-year graduation rates for the regents universities. b. For distribution to the western Iowa regents resource center: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 268,297 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the state board of regents and the institutions of higher learning governed by the state board of regents shall not reduce moneys budgeted for the fiscal year for the institutionsâ police departments. d. For allocation in equal parts by the state board of regents to the state university of Iowa, the Iowa state university of science and technology, and the university of northern Iowa to support the John Pappajohn centers for Senate File 647, p. 14 entrepreneurship: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be used to supplement, not supplant, any other funding received by the John Pappajohn centers for entrepreneurship. 2. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA a. General university For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,496,355 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5,058.55 b. Oakdale campus For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,103,819 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 38.25 c. State hygienic laboratory For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,822,610 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 102.50 d. Family practice program For allocation by the dean of the college of medicine, with approval of the advisory board, to qualified participants to carry out the provisions of chapter 148D for the family practice residency education program, including salaries and support, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,220,598 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.71 e. Child health care services For specialized child health care services, including childhood cancer diagnostic and treatment network programs, rural comprehensive care for hemophilia patients, and the Iowa high-risk infant follow-up program, including salaries and support, and for not more than the following full-time Senate File 647, p. 15 equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 634,502 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.16 f. Statewide cancer registry For the statewide cancer registry, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 143,410 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.10 g. Substance abuse consortium For distribution to the Iowa consortium for substance abuse research and evaluation, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 53,427 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .99 h. Center for biocatalysis For the center for biocatalysis, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 696,342 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.28 i. Primary health care initiative For the primary health care initiative in the college of medicine, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 624,374 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.22 From the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, $254,889 shall be allocated to the department of family practice at the state university of Iowa college of medicine for family practice faculty and support staff. j. Birth defects registry For the birth defects registry, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 36,839 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .38 k. Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center For the Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 156,389 Senate File 647, p. 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.75 l. Iowa online advanced placement academy science, technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative For the Iowa online advanced placement academy science, technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative established pursuant to section 263.8A : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 463,616 m. Iowa flood center For the Iowa flood center for use by the universityâs college of engineering pursuant to section 466C.1 : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,205,593 n. College of nursing For employing additional instructors in the college of nursing to increase the number of students who graduate from the college of nursing: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 o. Iowa cancer assessment and intervention plan For purposes of developing an Iowa cancer assessment and intervention plan, under the direction of and on behalf of the department of health and human services, pursuant to an agreement between the state university of Iowa and the department of health and human services: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 The Iowa cancer assessment and intervention plan must include a thorough analysis of the potential causes of Iowaâs high incidence of cancer in order to guide the department of health and human services in developing targeted policies, enhancing prevention and screening programs, raising public awareness, and integrating evidence-based findings into existing initiatives. The state university of Iowaâs expenditure of moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph is contingent upon the state university of Iowa complying with the terms, conditions, and prescribed deliverables in the agreement between the university and the department of health and human services. 3. IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY a. General university For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the Senate File 647, p. 17 following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,445,037 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 3,647.42 b. Agricultural experiment station For the agricultural experiment station salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30,462,535 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 185.63 c. Cooperative extension service in agriculture and home economics For the cooperative extension service in agriculture and home economics salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 18,157,366 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 240.41 d. Preparing Iowaâs future ready workforce and fostering innovation For purposes of addressing the stateâs workforce needs in the areas of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics by expanding degree and certificate programs in the areas of artificial intelligence, cybersecurity, computer science, computer engineering, data science, software engineering, and other high-demand areas related to technology, and fostering innovation in the areas of digital agriculture, manufacturing, water quality, vaccine delivery technologies, and biosciences: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 4. UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN IOWA a. General university For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,894,146 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1,250.28 b. Real estate education program For purposes of the real estate education program, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 123,523 Senate File 647, p. 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .86 c. Educators for Iowa For purposes of recruiting additional students to participate in educational opportunities that lead to teacher licensure: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 d. Center for civic education For purposes of establishing and operating a center for civic education that promotes the values of free speech, civic leadership, public service, and citizenship, and that enhances civic education among students enrolled in colleges and universities in this state, students enrolled in prekindergarten through grade twelve in schools in this state, teachers, and the public by developing and implementing effective civic learning strategies, encouraging respectful dialogue, and offering educational resources related to free speech and civic knowledge: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 e. In-state tuition for students who reside in contiguous states For purposes of classifying students who reside in contiguous states and who will enroll in the undergraduate program offered by the university of northern Iowa as residents of this state for purposes of undergraduate tuition and mandatory fees: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 Sec. 7. ENERGY COST-SAVINGS PROJECTS ââ FINANCING. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the state board of regents may use notes, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness issued under section 262.48 to finance projects that will result in energy cost savings in an amount that will cause the state board to recover the cost of the projects within an average of six years. DIVISION IV STANDING APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 8. AT-RISK CHILDREN. Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in section 279.51 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department of Senate File 647, p. 19 education for programs for at-risk children under section 279.51 shall not be more than $10,524,389. The amount of any reduction in this section shall be prorated among the programs specified in section 279.51, subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ, âbâ, and âcâ. Sec. 9. WORK-STUDY APPROPRIATION. Notwithstanding section 256.209, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from the general fund of the state to the college student aid commission of the department of education for the work-study program under section 256.209 shall be zero. Sec. 10. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes effect July 1, 2025, if the portion of 2025 Iowa Acts, Senate File 445, or any successor legislation, that reduces the standing appropriation in section 279.51, subsection 1, is not enacted: The section of this division of this Act relating to the standing appropriation in section 279.51, subsection 1. DIVISION V STATE PROGRAM ALLOCATION Sec. 11. Section 284.13, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, c, e, f, and g, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: a. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department, the amount of five hundred eight thousand two hundred fifty dollars for the issuance of national board certification awards in accordance with section 256.44 . Of the amount allocated under this paragraph, not less than eighty-five thousand dollars shall be used to administer the ambassador to education position in accordance with section 256.45 . b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and ending June 30, 2025 2026 , up to seven hundred twenty-eight thousand two hundred sixteen dollars to the department for purposes of implementing the professional development program requirements of section 284.6 , assistance in developing model evidence for teacher quality committees established pursuant to section 284.4, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ , and the evaluator training program in section 284.10 . A portion of the funds allocated to the department for purposes of this paragraph may Senate File 647, p. 20 be used by the department for administrative purposes and for not more than four full-time equivalent positions. c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and ending June 30, 2025 2026 , an amount up to one million seventy-seven thousand eight hundred ten dollars to the department for the establishment of teacher development academies in accordance with section 284.6, subsection 10 . A portion of the funds allocated to the department for purposes of this paragraph may be used for administrative purposes. e. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department an amount up to fifty thousand dollars for purposes of the fine arts beginning teacher mentoring program established under section 256.34 . f. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department an amount up to six hundred twenty-six thousand one hundred ninety-one dollars shall be used by the department for a delivery system, in collaboration with area education agencies, to assist in implementing the career paths and leadership roles considered pursuant to sections 284.15 , 284.16 , and 284.17 , including but not limited to planning grants to school districts and area education agencies, technical assistance for the department, technical assistance for districts and area education agencies, training and staff development, and the contracting of external expertise and services. In using moneys allocated for purposes of this paragraph, the department shall give priority to school districts with certified enrollments of fewer than six hundred students. A portion of the moneys allocated annually to the department for purposes of this paragraph may be used by the department for administrative purposes and for not more than five full-time equivalent positions. g. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and for each subsequent fiscal year, to the department, ten million dollars for purposes of implementing the supplemental assistance for high-need schools provisions of section 284.11 . Annually, of the moneys allocated to the department for purposes of this paragraph, up to one hundred thousand dollars may be used by the department for administrative purposes and for not more than one full-time equivalent position. Senate File 647, p. 21 DIVISION VI COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: For deposit in the court reporter equipment grant program fund created in section 256.231, as enacted by this division of this Act: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50,000 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 256.231 Court reporter equipment grant program. 1. A court reporter equipment grant program is established to be administered by the college student aid commission. A person is eligible to apply for a grant award under the program if the person is enrolled in a court reporter training program in this state. 2. Each applicant for the court reporter equipment grant program shall, in accordance with the rules of the commission, complete and file an application for a grant award. The individual shall be responsible for the prompt submission of any information required by the commission. 3. A recipient of a grant under the court reporter equipment grant program must use the moneys awarded by the college student aid commission for the purchase of court reporter equipment and software for the court reporter training program in which the recipient is participating. 4. The college student aid commission shall do all of the following: a. Establish the evaluation criteria to be used in evaluating applications submitted under this section. The college student aid commission shall give priority to applicants who are doing court-related work. b. Establish grant application materials, eligibility requirements, award criteria, and award amounts. 5. A court reporter equipment grant program fund is created in the state treasury under the control of the college student Senate File 647, p. 22 aid commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated to the college student aid commission to be used for grants awarded as provided under this section. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 6. The college student aid commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. Sec. 14. REPEAL. Sections 15.485 and 15.486, Code 2025, are repealed. Sec. 15. COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT INCENTIVE FUND ââ TRANSFER TO COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM FUND. Unencumbered and unobligated moneys remaining in the court reporter equipment incentive fund established pursuant to section 15.486, Code 2025, on the effective date of this division of this Act, are transferred to the court reporter equipment grant program fund created in section 256.231, as enacted by this division of this Act. Sec. 16. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall designate section 256.231, as enacted by this division of this Act, as a new subpart within chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 4, entitled âcourt reporter equipment grant programâ. DIVISION VII CENTER FOR INTELLECTUAL FREEDOM Sec. 17. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS ââ STATE BOARD OF REGENTS ââ CENTER FOR INTELLECTUAL FREEDOM. 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the state board of regents for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for purposes of the center for intellectual freedom established at the state university of Iowa pursuant to section 263C.2, if enacted by 2025 Iowa Acts, House File 437: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the Senate File 647, p. 23 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated. DIVISION VIII IOWA TUITION GRANTS Sec. 18. Section 256.177, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 19. Section 256.189, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 3. An Iowa tuition grants fund is established in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received by the commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated to the commission for purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in accredited private institutions. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain available for expenditure for purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in accredited private institutions for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of administering any scholarship or grant program described in this subchapter VII, part 4. Sec. 20. Section 256.191, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 8. Fund established. An Iowa tuition grants for-profit institutions fund is established in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received by the commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated to the commission for purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in eligible institutions. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain available for expenditure for Senate File 647, p. 24 purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in eligible institutions for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of administering any scholarship or grant program described in this subchapter VII, part 4. Sec. 21. Section 256.192, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 8. A vocational-technical tuition grants fund is established in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received by the commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated to the commission for purposes of providing vocational-technical tuition grants pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain available for expenditure for purposes of providing vocational-technical tuition grants pursuant to this section for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of administering any scholarship or grant program described in this subchapter VII, part 4. Sec. 22. Section 256.194, subsections 1, 2, and 3, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the commission for For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the commission for deposit in the Iowa tuition grants fund established in section 256.189, subsection 3, the sum of fifty-two million seven hundred seven thousand sixty-nine dollars for tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in accredited private institutions fifty-three million seven hundred sixty-one thousand two hundred ten dollars . 2. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state Senate File 647, p. 25 to the commission for For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the commission for deposit in the Iowa tuition grants for-profit institutions fund established in section 256.191, subsection 8, the sum of one hundred ten thousand seven hundred dollars for tuition grants for qualified students who are enrolled in eligible institutions one hundred twelve thousand nine hundred fourteen dollars . 3. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the commission for For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the commission for deposit in the vocational-technical tuition grants fund established in section 256.192, subsection 8, the sum of one million seven hundred fifty thousand one hundred eighty-five dollars for vocational-technical tuition grants . Sec. 23. SCHOLARSHIP AND TUITION GRANT RESERVE FUND ââ TRANSFER TO GENERAL FUND. Any moneys appropriated to the department of education for purposes of the scholarship and tuition grant reserve fund established pursuant to section 256.193 that remain unencumbered or unobligated as of July 1, 2025, shall be transferred to the general fund of the state. Sec. 24. TRANSFER OF UNENCUMBERED OR UNOBLIGATED MONEYS TO IOWA TUITION GRANTS FUND, IOWA TUITION GRANTS FOR-PROFIT INSTITUTIONS FUND, AND VOCATIONAL-TECHNICAL TUITION GRANTS FUND. 1. Any moneys appropriated to the department of education prior to the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in accredited private institutions pursuant to section 256.194, subsection 1, that remain unencumbered or unobligated as of July 1, 2025, shall be transferred to the Iowa tuition grants fund established in section 256.189, subsection 3, as enacted in this division of this Act. 2. Any moneys appropriated to the department of education prior to the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled in eligible institutions pursuant to section 256.194, subsection 2, that remain unencumbered or unobligated as of Senate File 647, p. 26 July 1, 2025, shall be transferred to the Iowa tuition grants for-profit institutions fund established in section 256.191, subsection 8, as enacted in this division of this Act. 3. Any moneys appropriated to the department of education prior to the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for purposes of vocational-technical tuition grants pursuant to section 256.194, subsection 3, that remain unencumbered or unobligated as of July 1, 2025, shall be transferred to the vocational-technical tuition grants fund established in section 256.192, subsection 8, as enacted in this division of this Act. Sec. 25. REPEAL. Section 256.193, Code 2025, is repealed. DIVISION IX COLLEGE STUDENT AID COMMISSION PROGRAMS Sec. 26. Section 256.212, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6. Fund established. An all Iowa opportunity scholarship fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated and made available to the commission to be used for scholarships for students meeting the requirements of this section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall be available for purposes of this section in subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4. Sec. 27. Section 256.218, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6. A teach Iowa scholar fund is established in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and any other moneys received by the commission for deposit in the fund, including payments collected by the commission pursuant to section 256.219, subsection 7 . The moneys in the fund are appropriated to the commission for the teach Iowa scholar program. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in Senate File 647, p. 27 the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state but shall remain available for expenditure for the teach Iowa scholar program for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 . Sec. 28. Section 256.226, subsection 10, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10. Trust fund established. A rural veterinary care trust fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under the control of the commission. The commission may accept gifts, grants, bequests, and other private contributions, as well as state or federal moneys, for deposit in the fund. The commission shall remit all repayments made pursuant to this section to the rural veterinary care trust fund. All moneys deposited or paid into the trust fund are appropriated and made available to the commission to be used for meeting the requirements of this section and increasing the number of veterinarians participating in the program. Moneys in the fund up to the total amount that an eligible individual may receive for an eligible loan in accordance with this section and upon fulfilling the requirements of subsection 4 , shall be considered encumbered for the duration of the agreement entered into pursuant to subsection 4 . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall be available for purposes of this section and to increase the number of veterinarians participating in the program in subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4. Sec. 29. Section 256.228, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5. Fund created. A future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship fund is created in the state treasury Senate File 647, p. 28 as a separate fund under the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated and made available to the commission to be used for scholarships awarded as provided under this section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall be available for purposes of this section in subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4. Sec. 30. Section 256.229, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5. Fund created. A future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated and made available to the commission to be used for grants awarded as provided under this section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall be available for purposes of this section in subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4. Sec. 31. Section 256.230, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8. Fund created. An Iowa workforce grant and incentive program fund is created in the state treasury under the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated to the commission to be used for grants and incentive payments awarded as provided in this section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited Senate File 647, p. 29 to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid commission for purposes of administering any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 647, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor